Illinois, session 104th, HB4049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $10,500,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 6Agriculture from the Partners for Conservation Fund for grants 7to Soil and Water Conservation Districts for ordinary and 8contingent administrative expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.